Massachusetts, session 194th, S674.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth the Carbon
Sequestration Support Fund, the purpose of which shall be to provide grants to support actions to
increase the sequestration of carbon from the atmosphere.
of 1